Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1038.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-407.04, to read: START_STATUTE16-407.04. Cast vote record; public record; definition A. Within forty-eight hours after the county board of supervisors TRANSMITS the county canvass to the secretary of STATE, the board of supervisors or the officer in charge of elections shall transmit The cast vote record to the secretary of state in a sortable format. The transmitted cast vote record shall be unaltered except that, for precincts, precinct splits and ballot styles that contain fewer than twenty-five registered voters, the board of supervisors or officer in charge of elections shall include only the number of voters and the number of cast vote records. B. The board of supervisors or officer in charge of elections shall not randomize or otherwise alter the original files. C. The information and records prescribed by subsection A of this section constitute a public record. D. For the purposes of this section, "cast vote record" means an electronic record of the voters' selections as captured by a tabulation device from a ballot or a ballot image that cannot be linked to a specific voter.END_STATUTE